Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Local Government Economic Assistance Program

42.450.
Local Government Economic Assistance Fund — Sources.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a fund entitled “Local Government Economic Assistance Fund.” The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested pursuant to KRS

42.500

and the income earned from the investment shall be prorated for expenditure in coal producing and coal impact counties according to each county’s allocable part in the fund.

Effective July 1, 1981, an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the tax collected annually on the sale of minerals, exclusive of coal, shall be transferred from the general fund into this fund. The transfers shall be made quarterly, based upon the revenue estimates prevailing at the time each quarterly transfer is due, except that the last quarterly transfer shall be made after the close of the fiscal year accounting records, and shall be adjusted to provide the balance of the annual transfer required by this subsection.

Effective October 1, 2010, the quarterly transfer of funds required by subsection (2) of this section shall be made only after the quarterly installment of the annual amount from the prior calendar year allowed as an incentive to an approved company under KRS

143A.025

and

154.27-060

has been made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 1, effective July 1, 1980; 1986, ch. 464, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 1992; 2010, ch. 115, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 139, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 115 and 139, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where KRS

42.490

transfers the coal haul road money from unencumbered fund balances under KRS

42.300

(repealed), KRS

42.330

(repealed) and KRS

177.970

(repealed) to the local government assistance fund under KRS

42.450

et seq. of a county which has no county road over which coal is being hauled, the county through the fiscal court can spend the funds on one or more of the priority categories listed under subsections 2(a) through 2(i) of KRS

42.455

including any county road under subsection 2(c) within the limits of KRS

178.010

, even though no coal is hauled over it.

OAG 81-15

.

Although a county receiving moneys from the Economic Assistance Fund established under this section would appear to have statutory authorization to make expenditures from the fund to such nonprofit organizations as little league baseball pursuant to the language of subsection (2) of KRS

42.455

and 67.083(3)(f) which allow expenditures for “recreation,” such an appropriation would violate the prohibition of Ky. Const., § 179 against appropriations for corporations since the baseball program is not a county operation or function and is not under the basic operative control or management of the fiscal court.

OAG 81-381

.

Penalty and interest on delinquent coal severance taxes should not be included in the calculations of the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund.

OAG 84-66

.

42.4501.
Definitions for KRS 42.450 to 42.495.

As used in KRS

42.450

to

42.495

:

“Refund” means a payment of money from the State Treasury to a taxpayer, upon the authorization of the Department of Revenue following the submission of a timely request filed in accordance with applicable statutes and administrative regulations, representing all or part of an overpayment previously made by the taxpayer for a tax liability arising under KRS

143.020

or

143A.020

; and

“Severance and processing taxes on coal collected annually” means the total amount of money collected from the tax imposed by KRS

143.020

in a given fiscal year, reduced by the total amount of refunds of that tax paid during the prior fiscal year.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.453.
Kentucky Coal Fields Endowment Authority — Creation — Role and duties — Project eligibility criteria — Appropriation — Tax exemption.

The Kentucky Coal Fields Endowment Authority is hereby created as a public corporation, governmental agency, and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, with the perpetual succession and with power in that name to:

Contract and be contracted with;

Acquire and convey property;

Sue and be sued;

Have and use a corporate seal;

Adopt bylaws;

Invest moneys; and

Exercise, in addition to the powers and functions specifically stated in this section and KRS

42.454

all of the usual powers of private corporations to the extent that the same are not inconsistent with specifically enumerated powers or limitations upon public corporations.

It shall be the role and duty of the authority to support through funding efforts to diversify the economy of the coal fields within Kentucky.

Projects that may be funded shall be non-recurring investments in:

Economic development;

Public infrastructure, water, and wastewater;

Public health and safety; and

Information technology development and access.

Projects shall be selected based on economic impact, job creation, workforce development, community benefit, available partnerships, project readiness, and the ability for a project to be self-sustaining.

Seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) of the severance and processing taxes on coal collected annually shall be transferred from the general fund to the Kentucky coal fields endowment authority established in this section. The transfers shall be made in quarterly amounts of one million eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($1,875,000) at the same time as the transfers to the local government economic development fund.

Moneys transferred to the authority are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purpose. State moneys appropriated that are not spent at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse.

All property and income of the Kentucky coal fields endowment authority shall be exempt from all taxes and assessment of any nature.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 164, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (5) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (6) at 1641.

42.454.
Membership of Kentucky Coal Fields Endowment Authority — Terms — Disclosure of certain ownership interest — Officers — Investment options.

As used in this section:

“Authority” means the Kentucky coal fields endowment authority;

“Board” means the chair, vice chair, and secretary-treasurer of the authority;

“Chair” means the chair of the Kentucky coal fields endowment authority;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Local Government; and

“Eligible counties” means counties of the Commonwealth of Kentucky participating in the Local Government Economic Development Fund on June 29, 2017, and those that participated on January 1, 2016;

The authority shall consist of seven (7) persons, who shall be selected as follows:

Two (2) persons, appointed by the Governor, from counties located within the Eastern Coal Field;

Two (2) persons, appointed by the Governor, from counties located within the Western Coal Field;

Two (2) persons, appointed by the Governor, possessing experience and expertise in finance and investment; and

The commissioner or the commissioner’s proxy.

Two (2) members initially appointed to the authority shall have a term of one (1) year each, two (2) members initially appointed to the authority shall have a term of two (2) years each, and two (2) members initially appointed to the authority shall have a term of three (3) years each, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term. All subsequent appointments shall be for a term of three (3) years.

The board members are hereby determined to be officers and agents of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and, as such, shall enjoy the same immunities from suit for the performance of their official acts as do other officers of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

If any member or officer of the authority shall be interested in, either directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer of, employee of, or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested directly or indirectly in any project funded by the authority, the interest shall be disclosed clearly in the application and shall be set forth in the minutes of the authority, and the member or officer having an interest therein shall not participate in the application process.

Any person appointed to the authority shall be eligible for reappointment.

The members of the authority shall elect biennially from the authority’s membership the following offices: chair, vice chair, secretary-treasurer, and any assistant secretaries and assistant treasurers the authority deems necessary. The commissioner shall not be eligible to hold any of these offices.

A majority of the members of the authority, determined by excluding any existing vacancies from the total number of members, shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of the members present at a duly called meeting of the authority shall be required for the purposes of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes.

The authority shall prepare bylaws and procedures applicable to the operation of the authority and submit them to the commissioner to be promulgated as administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

Members of the authority shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses in connection with the performance of their duties.

The authority shall meet twice annually and at other times upon call of the chair or a majority of the board to discuss and vote on funding for projects in eligible counties permitted to receive moneys from the authority under KRS 42.453(2).

The authority may invest any and all of the assets of the fund in:

Obligations and contracts for future delivery of obligations backed by the full faith and credit of the United States or a United States government agency, including but not limited to:

United States Treasury;

Export-Import Bank of the United States;

Farmers Home Administration;

Government National Mortgage Corporation; and

Merchant Marine bonds;

Obligations of any corporation of the United States government or government-sponsored enterprise, including but not limited to:

Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation;

Federal Farm Credit Banks;

Bank for Cooperatives;

Federal Intermediate Credit Banks; and

Federal Land Banks;

Federal Home Loan Banks;

Federal National Mortgage Association; and

Tennessee Valley Authority obligations;

Collateralized or uncollateralized certificates of deposit, issued by banks rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization or other interest-bearing accounts in depository institutions chartered by this state or by the United States, except for shares in mutual savings banks;

Bankers acceptances for banks rated in the highest short-term category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Commercial paper rated in the highest short-term category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Securities issued by a state or local government, or any instrumentality or agency thereof, in the United States, and rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest long-term categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

United States denominated corporate, Yankee, and Eurodollar securities, excluding corporate stocks, issued by foreign and domestic issuers, including sovereign and supranational governments, rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest long-term categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Asset-backed securities rated in the highest category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Shares of mutual funds, each of which shall have the following characteristics:

The mutual fund shall be an open-end diversified investment company registered under Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended;

The management company of the investment company shall have been in operation for at least five (5) years; and

The mutual fund shall be rated in the highest category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization; and

State and local delinquent property tax claims which upon purchase shall become certificates of delinquency secured by interests in real property not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in the aggregate. For any certificates of delinquency that have been exonerated pursuant to KRS 132.220(5), the Department of Revenue shall offset the loss suffered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet against subsequent local distributions to the affected taxing districts as shown on the certificate of delinquency.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 164, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1075.

42.455.
Local Government Economic Assistance Program — Grants for priority expenditures — Administrative regulations — Public hearings — Reports — Directory of coal road system.

There is established within the Department for Local Government a Local Government Economic Assistance Program to consist of a system of grants to local governments to improve the environment for new industry and to improve the quality of life for the residents.

Grants obtained under this program shall be used for priority expenditures. Thirty percent (30%) of all moneys in the fund shall be spent on the coal haul road system as described in subsection (8) of this section. The remaining seventy percent (70%) of the fund shall be spent on priority categories limited to the following, but in no event shall grants obtained under this program be used for expenses related to administration of government:

Public safety, including law enforcement, fire protection, ambulance service, and other related services;

Environmental protection, including sewage disposal, sanitation, solid waste, and other related programs;

Public transportation, including mass transit systems, streets, and roads;

Health;

Recreation;

Libraries and educational facilities;

Social services for the poor, the elderly, and individuals with disabilities;

Industrial and economic development;

Vocational education;

Workforce training; and

Secondary wood industry development.

The use of entitlement funds for repayment of debt as related to long-term bond issues is permissible as long as the revenue from the bond issues is expended on priority categories.

Grants obtained under this program may be used as local portion to secure federal programs as long as program expenditures are in the priority category area. Interest earned on funds received by local units of government shall be considered available for use by the local unit of government in the priority expenditure categories.

The Department for Local Government shall be responsible for the promulgation of rules and regulations necessary to implement the grants programs authorized by this section.

The Department for Local Government shall submit an annual report to the Governor indicating how the grants were used and an evaluation of the program’s effectiveness in improving the economy of the units of government receiving assistance.

Prior to a local government’s expenditure of any funds it receives under this section, the local government shall allow an opportunity for public input and comments regarding the expenditure of those funds. Before any unit of local government expends any funds it receives under this section, it shall:

Provide an opportunity to the public to provide input with regard to the project or projects in a public meeting for which notice has been given under KRS 61.823(2) to (4);

Include the topic as a specific item on the public meeting agenda and shall allow any person to speak with regard to any proposed project, any project which he or she feels should be built or done which has not been proposed, priorities for completion of projects, and any other matter related to expenditure of any funds it receives under this section. The local government shall not be bound by the comments and input provided at the meeting but shall give due consideration to them; and

Not begin construction on a project until the meeting as provided in this section has been held.

This subsection shall not be construed to require a separate meeting for each project. A single meeting encompassing the program, if all projects subsequently undertaken have been identified at the meeting, shall meet the requirements of this subsection.

On or before August 15, 1980, and each year thereafter, the Transportation Cabinet shall publish and furnish to the Department for Local Government a directory, including supporting maps and other documents, designating the official state coal road system in coal-impact and coal-producing counties which shall include all public highways, roads, and streets over which quantities of coal, sufficient to significantly affect the condition and state of repair of highways, roads, and streets, have been transported in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The cabinet shall further publish the total county mileage of the official state coal road system and the total ton/miles within each coal-impact and coal-producing county for said preceding fiscal year.

Every person shipping or transporting coal, and every carrier for hire or common carrier hauling coal over the public highways, roads, and streets shall file with the Transportation Cabinet such information and at intervals as the cabinet shall designate by regulation duly adopted for the purpose of identifying those highways, roads, and streets comprising the coal haul road system and the quantities of coal transported thereon, in order that the cabinet can accurately calculate total ton/miles within each coal-impact and coal-producing county.

The Department of Revenue shall make available to the Transportation Cabinet coal severance and processing tax data for use in verifying and supplementing the information furnished under the provisions of subsection (9) of this section. The information shall be furnished in such a manner as to conceal the identity of individual taxpayers; if the data cannot be furnished without revealing the identity of individual taxpayers, it shall be withheld.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 394, § 2, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 374, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 18, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 224, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 10, effective July 15, 1998, 2005, ch. 85, § 53, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 18, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 24, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 10, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where KRS

42.490

transfers the coal haul road money from unencumbered fund balances under KRS

42.300

(repealed), KRS

42.330

(repealed) and KRS

177.970

(repealed) to the local government assistance fund under KRS

42.450

et seq. of a county which has no county road over which coal is being hauled, the county through the fiscal court can spend the funds on one or more of the priority categories listed under subsections 2(a) through 2(i) of this section including any county road under subsection 2(c) within the limits of KRS

178.010

, even though no coal is hauled over it.

OAG 81-15

.

Although a county receiving moneys from the Economic Assistance Fund established under KRS

42.450

would appear to have statutory authorization to make expenditures from the fund to such nonprofit organizations as little league baseball pursuant to the language of subsection (2) of this section and 67.083(3)(f) which allow expenditures for “recreation”, such an appropriation would violate the prohibition of Ky. Const., § 179 against appropriations for corporations since the baseball program is not a county operation or function and is not under the basic operative control or management of the fiscal court.

OAG 81-381

.

Future receipts of county coal severance funds could not be obligated by a fiscal court beyond its present term of office for the future construction of a high school pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section; a fiscal court cannot, due to the restrictions of Ky. Const., § 157, create county obligations in any year which would be in excess of the county’s income and revenue for that particular year without a vote of the people.

OAG 81-408

.

A fiscal court in a county affected by the local government economic assistance program has no authority to enact an ordinance requiring all coal transporters to file the form TD 59-100 (Coal Severor and/or Route and Tonnage Report) with the transportation cabinet, or an ordinance requiring similar reports to be filed with the fiscal court. There is no statute expressly granting counties the authority to enact ordinances in this kind of situation, neither is there any necessary implication of such authority; moreover, the nature of the state legislation is such that it can be seen clearly as a state-preempted financial program of assistance to local governments.

OAG 83-77

.

42.4582.
Local government economic development fund — Adjustment for quarterly transfers — Schedule of transfers from general fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a fund entitled “Local Government Economic Development Fund.” The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as provided for in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be prorated for grants to counties according to the allotment schedule set out in KRS

42.4592

.

Moneys shall be transferred from the general fund in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the severance and processing taxes on coal collected annually, unless otherwise amended by the budget bill.

The transfers shall be made quarterly, based upon the revenue estimates prevailing at the time each quarterly transfer is due. Each quarterly transfer shall be adjusted to account for refunds by determining the total amount of refunds paid in the prior fiscal year, dividing that amount by four (4), and reducing each transfer by this amount. The last quarterly transfer shall be made after the close of the fiscal year accounting records, and shall be adjusted to provide the balance of the annual transfer required by this subsection.

The quarterly calculation and transfer of funds pursuant to this section shall be made only after distribution of the quarterly installment of the annual amount from the prior calendar year allowed as an incentive to an approved company under KRS

143.024

and

154.27-060

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 107, § 4, effective July 1, 1992; 1996, ch. 101, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 76, effective December 12, 1996; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 15, effective August 30, 2007; 2012, ch. 110, § 13, effective April 11, 2012; 2016 ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/96). The reference to KRS 45.4592 at the end of subsection (1) of this statute has been corrected to read KRS

42.4592

, remedying an inadvertent misnumbering in codification.
See
1992 Ky. Acts ch. 107, secs. 4 and 7.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

. See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.4585.
Transfers from local government economic development fund to local government economic assistance fund — Schedule of transfers.

A portion of each quarterly transfer of moneys provided for in KRS

42.4582

shall be transferred from the local government economic development fund into the local government economic assistance fund.

The amount transferred annually from the local government economic development fund into the local government economic assistance fund under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be not less than an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the severance and processing taxes on coal collected annually.

The quarterly calculation and transfer of funds pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be made only after distribution of the quarterly installment of the annual amount from the prior calendar year allowed as an incentive to an approved company under KRS

143.024

and

154.27-060

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 107, § 5, effective July 1, 1992; 1996 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 77, effective December 12, 1996; 2002, ch. 338, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 16, effective August 30, 2007; 2012, ch. 110, § 14, effective April 11, 2012.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (1) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (2) at 1641.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (10) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 11, (4) at 1641.

42.4586.
Transfers from local government economic development fund to secondary wood products development fund. [Repealed]

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 15, effective July 15, 1994) was repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 49, § 10 effective June 25, 2013.